pr11.dix
<pardef n="a/xu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>xu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xariMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xakkeV</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>	
		<e><p>
                <l>xakkAgi</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xakkoskara</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYigeV</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYigAgi</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYigoskara</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>xara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xariMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xara</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xaralli</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYalli</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>xe</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYe</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="i/xu_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>xu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYannu</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xariMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>xakkeV</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xakkAgi</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xakkoskara</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYigeV</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYigAgi</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYigoskara</l>
				<r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="o"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xara deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xariMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYiMxa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xara</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYa</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>xaralli</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>vugalYalli</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>		
        <e><p>
                <l>xe</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>vugalYe</l>
                <r>xu<s n="pn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="o"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="axu"><i>a</i><par n="a/xu_pn"/></e>
<e lm="ixu"><i>i</i><par n="i/xu_pn"/></e>
